Utah statutes.
70A-4-210.   Security interest of collecting bank in items, accompanying
documents, and proceeds.
(1)  A collecting bank has a security interest in an item and any accompanying
documents or the proceeds of either:
(a)  in case of an item deposited in an account, to the extent to which credit
given for the item has been withdrawn or applied;
(b)  in case of an item for which it has given credit available for withdrawal
as of right, to the extent of the credit given, whether or not the credit is
drawn upon or there is a right of charge-back; or
(c)  if it makes an advance on or against the item.
(2)  If credit given for several items received at one time or pursuant to a
single agreement is withdrawn or applied in part, the security interest
remains upon all the items, any accompanying documents or the proceeds of
either.  For the purpose of this section, credits first given are first
withdrawn.
(3)  Receipt by a collecting bank of a final settlement for an item is a
realization on its security interest in the item, accompanying documents, and
proceeds.  So long as the bank does not receive final settlement for the item
or give up possession of the item or possession or control of the accompanying
documents for purposes other than collection, the security interest continues
to that extent and is subject to Chapter 9a, Uniform Commercial Code - Secured
Transactions, but:
(a)  no security agreement is necessary to make the security interest
enforceable, Subsection 70A-9a-203(2)(c)(i);
(b)  no filing is required to perfect the security interest; and
(c)  the security interest has priority over conflicting perfected security
interests in the item, accompanying documents, or proceeds.
